Oklahoma, session 2026, SB421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 2002, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 2002. A. All parental rights are reserved to a parent

of a minor child without obstruction or interference from this

state, any political subdivision of this state, any other

governmental entity, or any other institution, including, but not

limited to, the following rights:

1. The right to direct the education of the minor child;

2. All rights of parents identified in Title 70 of the Oklahoma

Statutes, including the right to access and review all school

records relating to the minor child;

3. The right to direct the upbringing of the minor child;

Req. No. 371 Page 1

4. The right to direct the moral or religious training of the

minor child;

5. The right to make healthcare decisions for the minor child,

unless otherwise prohibited by law;

6. The Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the right to

access and review all medical records of the minor child, unless

otherwise prohibited by law or the parent is the subject of an

investigation of a crime committed against the minor child and a law

enforcement official requests that the information not be released.

A health care provider or health care facility shall give notice of

the right established by this paragraph in a clear and conspicuous

manner;

7. The right to consent in writing before a biometric scan of

the minor child is made, shared, or stored;

8. The right to consent in writing before any record of the

minor child’s blood or deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) is created,

stored, or shared, except as required by Sections 1-516 and 1-524.1

of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or unless authorized pursuant

to a court order;

9. The right to consent in writing before the state or any of

its political subdivisions makes a video or voice recording of the

minor child, unless the video or voice recording is made during or

as a part of a court proceeding, by law enforcement officers during

or as part of a law enforcement investigation, during or as part of

Req. No. 371 Page 2

a fo rensic interview in a criminal or Department of Human Services

investigation, or to be used solely for any of the following:

a. safety demonstrations, including the maintenance of

order and discipline in the common areas of a school

or on student transportation vehicles,

b. a purpose related to a legitimate academic or

extracurricular activity,

c. a purpose related to regular classroom instruction,

d. security or surveillance of buildings or grounds, and

e. a photo identification card; and

10. The right to be notified promptly if an employee of this

state, any political subdivision of this state, any other

governmental entity, or any other institution suspects that a

criminal offense has been committed against the minor child by

someone other than a parent, unless the incident has first been

reported to law enforcement and notification of the parent would

impede a law enforcement or Department of Human Services

investigation. This paragraph does not create any new obligation

for school districts and charter schools to report misconduct

between students at school, such as fighting or aggressive play,

that is routinely addressed as a student disciplinary matter by the

school.

B. This section does not authorize or allow a parent to engage

in conduct that is unlawful or to abuse or neglect a child in

Req. No. 371 Page 3

viol ation of the laws of this state. This section shall not be

construed to apply to a parental action or decision that would end

life. This section does not prohibit courts, law enforcement

officers, or employees of a government agency responsible for child

welfare from acting in their official capacity within the reasonable

and prudent scope of their authority. This section does not

prohibit a court from issuing an order that is otherwise permitted

by law.

C. Any attempt to encourage or coerce a minor child to withhold

information from the child’s parent shall be grounds for discipline

of an employee of this state, any political subdivision of this

state, or any other governmental entity, except for law enforcement

personnel.

D. Unless those rights have been legally waived or legally

terminated, parents have inalienable rights that are more

comprehensive than those listed in this section. The Parents’ Bill

of Rights does not prescribe all rights of parents. Unless

otherwise required by law, the rights of parents of minor children

shall not be limited or denied. The Parents’ Bill of Rights shall

not be construed to apply to a parental action or decision that

would end life.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-371 DC 1/14/2025 3:51:15 PM

Req. No. 371 Page 4